North Dakota, session 69, HB1258.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 49-22-16 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
2. a. A certificate of site compatibility for an electric energy conversion facility may not
supersede or preempt any local land use, zoning, or building rules, regulations, or
ordinances and a site may not be designated which violates local land use, zoning, or
building rules, regulations, or ordinances.
A
b. Except as provided in this section, a permit for the construction of an electric
transmission facility within a designated corridor supersedes and preempts aany local
land use, or zoning, or building rule, regulation, or ordinance, upon a finding by the
commission that the rule, regulation, or ordinance, as applied to the proposed route, is
regulations.
c. Before an electric transmission facility is approved, the commission shall require the
applicant to comply with the road use agreements of the impacted political subdivision. A
permit may supersede and preempt the requirements of a political subdivision if the
applicant shows by a preponderance of the evidence the regulations or ordinances are
unreasonably restrictive in view of existing technology, factors of cost or economics, or
needs of consumers regardless of location. Without such a finding by the commission, a
route may not be designated which violates a local land use, zoning, or building rule,
regulation, or ordinance., or are in direct conflict with state or federal laws or rules.
d. When an application for a certificate for an electric transmission facility is filed, the
commission shall notify the townships with retained zoning authority, cities, and counties
in which any part of the proposed corridor is located. The commission may not schedule
a public hearing sooner than forty-five days from the date notification is sent by mail or
electronic mail. Upon notification, a political subdivision shall provide a listing to the
commission of all local requirements identified under this subsection. The listing of
requirements must be filed at least ten days before the hearing or the requirements are
superseded and preempted.
e. An applicant must comply with all local requirements provided to the commission under
subdivision d, which are not otherwise superseded by the commission.
SECTION 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICATION. This Act applies retroactively to January 1, 2025.

H. B. NO. 1258 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1258.
House Vote: Yeas 86 Nays 7 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 27 Nays 18 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State